Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 3. Virginia Medicaid Drug Formulary and Competitive Procurement of Drug Products.

§§ 32.1-331.6 through 32.1-331.11.
Repealed by Acts 1992, c. 200.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1992, c. 200, cl. 3 repealed §§

32.1-331.1

through

32.1-331.6

of Acts 1990, c. 968 which the Virginia Code Commission renumbered as §§

32.1-331.6

through 32.1-331.11. Furthermore, clause 3 of Acts 1991, c. 200 also repealed Acts 1990, c. 968, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 1991, c. 571, which made §§ 32.1-331.6 through 32.1-331.11 effective on July 1, 1992.